Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1247
Educational Service
Unit Coordinating Council; appoint distance education director; council director
authorized; salaries; expenses; duties; contract
authorized; other appointments authorized.

The
Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council shall appoint a distance education
director and may appoint a council director, both of whom shall hold office
at the pleasure of the council. The
council director and the distance education director shall receive such salaries
as the council determines and shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.
The council may contract with individual educational service units for the
employment of the council director or the distance education director, except
that the supervisory responsibilities for such employees shall remain with
the council.

The council director and the distance education director shall
perform duties as the council directs and shall not be members of the council.
The council may also appoint or retain such other persons as it may deem necessary
for the performance of its functions and shall prescribe their duties, fix
their compensation, and provide for reimbursement of their actual and necessary
expenses within the amounts available in the budget
of the council.

Laws 2007, LB603, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 30.